Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.23, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Sexually transmitted infections and diseases program. The commissioner of education, in consultation with the commissioner of health, shall assist districts in developing and implementing a program to prevent and reduce the risk of sexually transmitted infections and diseases, including but not exclusive to human immune deficiency virus and human papilloma virus. Each district must have a program that includes at least: (1) planning materials, guidelines, and other deleted text begin technicallydeleted text end new text begin medicallynew text end accurate and updated information; (2) a comprehensive, deleted text begin technicallydeleted text end new text begin medicallynew text end accurate, deleted text begin anddeleted text end updated curriculum that includes helping students to abstain from sexual activity deleted text begin until marriagedeleted text end new text begin and gain knowledge of other methods of preventing sexually transmitted infections, and is inclusive of all students regardless of their protected class statusnew text end ; (3) cooperation and coordination among districts and SCs; (4) a targeting of adolescents, especially those who may be at high risk of contracting sexually transmitted infections and diseases, for prevention efforts; (5) involvement of parents and other community members; (6) in-service training for appropriate district staff and school board members; (7) collaboration with state agencies and organizations having a sexually transmitted infection and disease prevention or sexually transmitted infection and disease risk reduction program; (8) collaboration with local community health services, agencies and organizations having a sexually transmitted infection and disease prevention or sexually transmitted infection and disease risk reduction program; and (9) participation by state and local student organizations. The department may provide assistance at a neutral site to a nonpublic school participating in a district's program. District programs must not conflict with the health and wellness curriculum developed under Laws 1987, chapter 398, article 5, section 2, subdivision 7. If a district fails to develop and implement a program to prevent and reduce the risk of sexually transmitted infection and disease, the department must assist the service cooperative in the region serving that district to develop or implement the program.